Oklahoma, session 2026, SB428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 405.4, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 405.4. A. Any person with a bachelor’s degree or

postgraduate degree shall be considered as having met the

educational requirements for a director of a full-time child care

center required by the Department of Human Services. Nothing in

this section shall be construed as to affect annual continuing

education requirements. The director of a child care center may

also qualify as a master teacher for children of all ages.

B. Any person replacing a master teacher at a child care center

shall be granted a one-year probationary period to fulfill the

educational qualifications required by the Department for a master

Req. No. 744 Page 1

teac her. The Department may extend the probationary period an

additional year as long as the person is actively pursuing that

goal.

C. 1. Prior to or within twelve (12) months of employment,

teaching personnel of child care facilities shall obtain and

maintain a current Oklahoma Professional Development Ladder (OPDL)

certificate as provided by rules promulgated by the Director of

Human Services.

2. Renewals and training for OPDL certification and any other

professional development or continuing education required by the

Department for child care facility personnel shall be on a two-year

cycle.

3. Infant safe sleep training shall be required every two (2)

years for any individual working with infants under one (1) year of

age.

D. Licensed child care facilities opened or expanded before

November 1, 2016, shall have thirty-five (35) square feet of floor

area per infant in rooms occupied only by infants. New construction

and existing space not previously licensed for child care after

November 1, 2016, shall have forty (40) square feet of floor area

per infant in rooms occupied only by infants.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-744 DC 1/14/2025 3:51:20 PM

Req. No. 744 Page 2